Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1818.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 28, chapter 23, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-7916, to read: START_STATUTE28-7916. Wayfinding signs; preapproved locations A. Notwithstanding any other law, a city or town may place wayfinding signs for preapproved locations within the JURISDICTION of the city or town without submitting an application for preapproval to the department. The city or town shall submit the finished sign placement location and design to the department. b. Preapproved locations for wayfinding sign directions include: 1. Downtown areas. 2. BUSINESS districts. 3. Schools. 4. Parks. 5. Arboretums. 6. Trails. 7. Community centers. 8. Municipal buildings. 9. Airports. 10. Bus or rail depots. 11. museums. 12. planetariums. 13. subdivisions as defined in section 32-2101 for newly constructed homes that are platted and recorded after the effective date of this section.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of transportation; grants; wayfinding signs; rural communities The sum of $300,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for grants to rural communities for full wayfinding signs. The department shall award grants pursuant to this section in conjunction with new department projects located in rural communities.